Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB933.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 241.065 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The number of quota retail package licenses issued by the Alcoholic Beverage
Control Board to licensees in counties containing cities of the first class, and
including such cities, shall not exceed a number equal to one (1) for every one
thousand five hundred (1,500) persons resident in such county.
(2) In order that a fixed and approved standard of population as prescribed in
subsection (1) of this section may be adopted, the annual estimates of population as
determined by the Kentucky State Data Center at the University of Louisville shall
be used in every year except a census year, and during a census year the United
States government census figures of population shall be controlling.
(3) A quota retail package license in a county containing a city of the first class shall
not be granted for premises located closer than one (1) mile from the nearest
other quota retail package license premises. The distance between locations of
quota retail package licenses as prescribed by this section shall be measured by
following the lesser of the shortest route of ordinary pedestrian travel or the
shortest route of ordinary vehicular travel along public roads or thoroughfares
from the main entrances of both quota retail package license premises.
(4) The location or status of any establishment operating with a quota retail package
license on the effective date of this Act shall not be affected by subsection (3) of
this section. Subsection (3) of this section shall not impair or limit the ability of
the location's owner or operator to renew the license for a location exempted
under this subsection.
(5) Any establishment exempted by subsection (4) of this section shall lose its exempt
status if the quota retail package license for that premises has lapsed, been
revoked, failed to renew, sold, transferred, or has become inactive or unavailable
Page 1 of 2
BR234600.100 - 2346 - XXXX 3/4/2026 4:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2346
for any other reason except:
(a) A temporary license suspension;
(b) The destruction of the premises property; or
(c) Loss of lease through the failure of the landlord to renew the lease.
Page 2 of 2
BR234600.100 - 2346 - XXXX 3/4/2026 4:59 PM Jacketed